California statutes. Business and Professions Code
(E) Death of a patient during or up to 24 hours after admittance of a patient to an outpatient setting that follows induction of anesthesia after surgery of a normal, healthy patient who has no organic, physiologic, biochemical, or psychiatric disturbance and for whom the pathologic processes for which the operation is to be performed are localized and do not entail a systemic disturbance.

(F) Transfer of a patient to a hospital or emergency center for medical treatment for a period exceeding 24 hours following a scheduled procedure outside of a general acute care hospital, as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 1250 of the Health and Safety Code.

(2) Product or device events, including the following:

(A) Patient death or serious disability associated with the use of a contaminated drug, device, or biologic provided by the outpatient setting when the contamination is the result of generally detectable contaminants in the drug, device, or biologic, regardless of the source of the contamination or the product.

(B) Patient death or serious disability
 associated with the use or function of a device in patient care in which the device is used or functions other than as intended. For purposes of this subparagraph, “device” includes, but is not limited to, a catheter, drain, or other specialized tube, infusion pump, or ventilator.

(C) Patient death or serious disability associated with intravascular air embolism that occurs while being cared for in an outpatient setting, excluding deaths associated with neurosurgical procedures known to present a high risk of intravascular air embolism.

(3) Patient protection events, including the following:

(A) A minor discharged to the wrong person.

(B) A patient suicide or
 attempted suicide resulting in serious disability while being cared for in an outpatient setting due to patient actions after admission to the outpatient setting.

(4) Care management events, including the following:

(A) A patient death or serious disability associated with a medication error, including, but not limited to, an error involving the wrong drug, the wrong dose, the wrong patient, the wrong time, the wrong rate, the wrong preparation, or the wrong route of administration, excluding reasonable differences in clinical judgment on drug selection and dose.

(B) A patient death or serious disability associated with a hemolytic reaction due to the administration of ABO-incompatible blood or blood products.

(C) Patient death or serious disability directly related to hypoglycemia, the onset of which occurs while the patient is being cared for in an outpatient setting.

(D) A patient death or serious disability due to spinal manipulative therapy performed at the outpatient setting.

(5) Environmental events, including the following:

(A) A patient death or serious disability associated with an electric shock while being cared for in an outpatient setting, excluding events involving planned treatments, such as electric countershock.

(B) Any incident in which a line designated for oxygen or other
 gas to be delivered to a patient contains the wrong gas or is contaminated by a toxic substance.

(C) A patient death or serious disability associated with a burn incurred from any source while being cared for in an outpatient setting.

(D) A patient death associated with a fall while being cared for in an outpatient setting.

(E) A patient death or serious disability associated with the use of restraints or bed rails while being cared for in an outpatient setting.

(6) Criminal events, including the following:

(A) Any instance of care ordered by or provided by someone impersonating
 a physician, nurse, pharmacist, or other licensed health care provider.

(B) The abduction of a patient of any age.

(C) The sexual assault on a patient within or on the grounds of an outpatient setting.

(D) The death or significant injury of a patient or staff member resulting from a physical assault that occurs within or on the grounds of an outpatient setting.

(7) An adverse event or series of adverse events that cause the death or serious disability of a patient, personnel, or visitor.

(c) The outpatient setting shall inform the patient or the party responsible for the patient of the adverse event by
 the time the report is made.

(d) “Serious disability” means a physical or mental impairment that substantially limits one or more of the major life activities of an individual, or the loss of bodily function, if the impairment or loss lasts more than seven days or is still present at the time of discharge from an inpatient health care facility, or the loss of a body part.

(e) “Surgical or other invasive procedures” are defined for the purposes of this section as operative procedures in which skin or mucous membranes and connective tissue are incised or an instrument is introduced through a natural body orifice. They include all procedures described by the codes in the surgery section of the Current Procedural Terminology.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 775, Sec. 71.   (SB 798)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

2216.4.

If an accredited outpatient setting fails to report an adverse event pursuant to Section 2216.3, the board may assess the accredited outpatient setting a civil penalty in an amount not to exceed one hundred dollars ($100) for each day that the adverse event is not reported following the initial five-day period or 24-hour period, as applicable. If the accredited outpatient setting disputes a determination by the board regarding an alleged failure to report an adverse event, the accredited outpatient setting may, within 10 days of notification of the board’s determination, request a hearing, which shall be conducted pursuant to the administrative adjudication provisions of Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 11400) and Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of
 Title 2 of the Government Code. Penalties shall be paid when appeals pursuant to those provisions have been exhausted.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 515, Sec. 13.   (SB 304)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

2217.

The Division of Licensing of the Medical Board of California may adopt regulations to implement this article and Chapter 1.3 (commencing with Section 1248) of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1276, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 12. Enforcement [2220. - 2319.]

2220.

Except as otherwise provided by law, the board may take action against all persons guilty of violating this chapter. The board shall enforce and administer this article as to physician and surgeon certificate holders, including those who hold certificates that do not permit them to practice medicine, such as, but not limited to, retired, inactive, or disabled status certificate holders, and the board shall have all the powers
 granted in this chapter for these purposes including, but not limited to:

(a) Investigating complaints from the public, from other licensees, from health care facilities, or from the board that a physician and surgeon may be guilty of unprofessional conduct. The board shall investigate the circumstances underlying a report received pursuant to Section 805 or 805.01 within 30 days to determine if an interim suspension order or temporary restraining order should be issued. The board shall otherwise provide timely disposition of the reports received pursuant to Section 805 and Section 805.01.

(b) Investigating the circumstances of practice of any physician and surgeon where there have been any judgments, settlements, or arbitration awards requiring the physician and surgeon or his or her professional liability insurer to pay an amount in damages in excess of a cumulative total of
 thirty thousand dollars ($30,000) with respect to any claim that injury or damage was proximately caused by the physician’s and surgeon’s error, negligence, or omission.

(c) Investigating the nature and causes of injuries from cases which shall be reported of a high number of judgments, settlements, or arbitration awards against a physician and surgeon.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 799, Sec. 12.   (SB 1575)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

2220.01.

(a) (1) The director shall appoint an independent enforcement monitor no later than March 1, 2022. The director may retain a person for this position by a personal services contract. The Legislature finds, pursuant to Section 19130 of the Government Code, that this is a new state function.

(2) The enforcement monitor shall not have previously been employed by, under contract with, in any financial relationship with, or affiliated with an organization that represents patient or physician and surgeon interests, including, but not limited to, a professional association, lobbyist employer, advocacy organization, or party that has appeared before the board or the Legislature.

(3) (A) The director shall supervise the enforcement monitor and may terminate or dismiss the enforcement monitor from this position.

(B) If the enforcement monitor is terminated or dismissed, the director shall appoint a replacement monitor within two months.

(4) The monitoring duty of the enforcement monitor shall be on a continuing basis for a period of no more than two years from the date of the initial enforcement monitor’s appointment.

(b) The enforcement monitor shall monitor and evaluate the board’s enforcement efforts with specific concentration on the handling and processing of complaints and timely application of sanctions or discipline imposed on licensees and persons in order to protect the public, which may include, but not be limited to, the following:

(1) The board’s disciplinary system and procedures.

(2) The consistency of complaint processing and investigation.

(3) The timeliness of the disciplinary process, including an evaluation of the board’s compliance with subdivision (b) of Section 129, and Sections 2220.08 and 2319. 

(4) Compliance with Section 2229, including deviations from the Manual of Model Disciplinary Orders and Disciplinary Guidelines in the board’s application of sanctions or discipline.

(5) Sanctions or discipline disproportionately applied to physicians and surgeons of color.

(6) Resources allocated for enforcement efforts.

(7) Any area that may lead to cost savings and greater effectiveness of the board’s enforcement efforts.

(c) The enforcement monitor shall not exercise authority over the board’s management or staff, but the board and its staff shall cooperate with the enforcement monitor and shall provide data, information, and files as requested by the enforcement monitor to perform all of the enforcement monitor’s duties.

(d) The director shall assist the enforcement monitor in the performance of the enforcement monitor’s duties, and the enforcement monitor shall have the same investigative authority as the director.

(e) The director may specify additional duties of the enforcement monitor for the purposes of this section.

(f) (1) The enforcement monitor shall submit to the department and the Legislature, pursuant to Section 9795 of the Government Code, an initial written report of the enforcement monitor’s findings and conclusions no later than January 1, 2023, and a final written report no later than July 1, 2023. The enforcement monitor shall be available to make oral reports to the department or the Legislature if requested to do so. The enforcement monitor may also provide additional information to either the department or the Legislature at the enforcement monitor’s discretion or at the request of either the department or the Legislature. The enforcement monitor shall make every effort to provide the board with an opportunity to reply to any facts, findings, issues, or conclusions made in their reports to the department or the Legislature with which the board may disagree.

 (2) The enforcement monitor shall make any report required by this paragraph available to the public and the media.

(g) The board shall pay for all of the costs associated with the employment of the enforcement monitor.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 649, Sec. 16.   (SB 806)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

2220.05.

(a) In order to ensure that its resources are maximized for the protection of the public, the Medical Board of California and the California Board of Podiatric Medicine shall prioritize their investigative and prosecutorial resources to ensure that physicians and surgeons and doctors of podiatric medicine representing the greatest threat of harm are identified and disciplined expeditiously. Cases involving any of the
 following allegations shall be handled on a priority basis, as follows, with the highest priority being given to cases in the first paragraph:

(1) Gross negligence, incompetence, or repeated negligent acts that involve death or serious bodily injury to one or more patients, such that the physician and surgeon or the doctor of podiatric medicine represents a danger to the public.

(2) Drug or alcohol abuse by a physician and surgeon or a doctor of podiatric medicine involving death or serious bodily injury to a patient.

(3) Repeated acts of clearly excessive prescribing, furnishing, or administering of controlled substances, or repeated acts of prescribing, dispensing, or furnishing of controlled substances without a good faith prior examination of the patient and medical reason therefor. However, in no event shall a
 physician and surgeon prescribing, furnishing, or administering controlled substances for intractable pain consistent with lawful prescribing, including, but not limited to, Sections 725, 2241.5, and 2241.6 of this code and Sections 11159.2 and 124961 of the Health and Safety Code, be prosecuted for excessive prescribing and prompt review of the applicability of these provisions shall be made in any complaint that may implicate these provisions.

(4) Repeated acts of clearly excessive recommending of cannabis to patients for medical purposes, or repeated acts of recommending cannabis to patients for medical purposes without a good faith prior examination of the patient and a medical reason for the recommendation.

(5) Sexual misconduct with one or more patients during a course of treatment or an examination.

(6) Practicing medicine while under the influence of drugs or alcohol.

(7) Repeated acts of clearly excessive prescribing, furnishing, or administering psychotropic medications to a minor without a good faith prior examination of the patient and medical reason therefor.

(b) The board may by regulation prioritize cases involving an allegation of conduct that is not described in subdivision (a). Those cases prioritized by regulation shall not be assigned a priority equal to or higher than the priorities established in subdivision (a).

(c) The Medical Board of California shall indicate in its annual report mandated by Section 2312 the number of temporary restraining orders, interim suspension orders, and disciplinary actions that are taken in each priority category specified in subdivisions (a) and
 (b).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 775, Sec. 72.   (SB 798)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

2220.08.

(a) Except for reports received by the board pursuant to Section 801.01 or 805 that may be treated as complaints by the board and new complaints relating to a physician and surgeon who is the subject of a pending accusation or investigation or who is on probation, any complaint determined to involve quality of care, before referral to a field office for further investigation, shall meet the following
 criteria:

(1) It shall be reviewed by one or more medical experts with the pertinent education, training, and expertise to evaluate the specific standard of care issues raised by the complaint to determine if further field investigation is required.

(2) It shall include the review of the following, which shall be requested by the board:

(A) Relevant patient records.

(B) The statement or explanation of the care and treatment provided by the physician and surgeon.

(C) Any additional expert testimony or literature provided by the physician and surgeon.

(D) Any additional facts or information requested by the medical expert
 reviewers that may assist them in determining whether the care rendered constitutes a departure from the standard of care.

(b) If the board does not receive the information requested pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) within 10 working days of requesting that information, the complaint may be reviewed by the medical experts and referred to a field office for investigation without the information.

(c) Nothing in this section shall impede the board’s ability to seek and obtain an interim suspension order or other emergency relief.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 515, Sec. 14.   (SB 304)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

2220.1.

(a) For purposes of this section, “patient representative” means the spouse or domestic partner of the patient, a person responsible for the care of the patient, or the patient’s next of kin.

(b) (1) Before a complaint within the jurisdiction of the board pertaining to the quality-of-care that a licensee provided to their patient may be closed, the board shall conduct an interview with the complainant, the patient, or the patient’s representative, if one is identified in the complaint.

(2) This subdivision shall not apply to complaints that are submitted anonymously or without the contact information of the complainant, patient, or a patient
 representative.

(c) If the board’s request for an interview is declined by the complainant, patient, or a patient representative identified in the complaint, or the board has not received a response within 30 calendar days, the board may close the complaint, if otherwise warranted.

(d) If, after the complaint is closed, the complainant, patient, or patient representative provides additional information pertinent to that complaint, the board may reopen the matter, subject to the provisions of Section 2230.5.

(e) The Legislature finds and declares that the board requires additional staff positions to implement this section. Therefore, this section shall only become operative six months following the allocation of positions to the board for the implementation of these provisions in the annual Budget
 Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 294, Sec. 11.   (SB 815)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Conditionally operative as prescribed by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

2220.2.

(a) For purposes of this section, “patient representative” means the spouse or domestic partner of the patient, a person responsible for the care of the patient, or the patient’s next of kin.

(b) (1) At the time that a complaint is referred for a field investigation, the relevant complainant, patient, or patient representative shall be provided with the opportunity to provide a statement relative to the harm they experienced.

(2) The complainant, patient, or patient representative shall have up to 60 days following receipt of the notification described in paragraph (1) to provide the statement to the board.

(3) Notwithstanding Section 2330, the statement shall be considered by the board, or a panel of the board, for the purposes of adjudicating the case to which the statement pertains.

(c) This section shall not apply to the Osteopathic Medical Board of California.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 294, Sec. 12.   (SB 815)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

2220.5.

(a) The Medical Board of California is the only licensing board that is authorized to investigate or commence disciplinary actions relating to physicians and surgeons who have been issued a certificate pursuant to Section 2050.

(b) For purposes of this section, “investigate or commence disciplinary actions” shall mean written, oral, or
 telephonic communication with a physician or surgeon concerning his or her violation of the Medical Practice Act or any other provision of this division.

(c) Written complaints that are subject to Section 43.96 of the Civil Code, relating to the professional conduct or professional competence of physicians and surgeons, shall be processed in accordance with that section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 309, Sec. 3.5.   (AB 1535)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

2220.6.

The board shall investigate any licensee against whom an information or indictment has been filed that alleges a violation of Section 550 of the Penal Code or Section 1871.4 of the Insurance Code, if the district attorney does not otherwise object to initiating an investigation.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 867, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

2220.7.

(a) A physician and surgeon shall not include or permit to be included any of the following provisions in an agreement to settle a civil dispute arising from his or her practice, whether the agreement is made before or after filing the action:

(1) A provision that prohibits another party to the dispute from contacting or cooperating with the board.

(2) A provision that prohibits another party to the dispute from
 filing a complaint with the board.

(3) A provision that requires another party to the dispute to withdraw a complaint he or she has filed with the board.

(b) A provision described in subdivision (a) is void as against public policy.

(c) A physician and surgeon who violates this section is subject to disciplinary action by the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 565, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

2221.

(a) The board may deny a physician’s and surgeon’s certificate to an applicant guilty of unprofessional conduct or of any cause that would subject a licensee to revocation or suspension of their license. The board, in its sole discretion, may issue a probationary physician’s and surgeon’s certificate to an applicant subject to terms and conditions, including, but not limited to, any of the following conditions of probation:

(1) Practice limited to a supervised, structured environment where the licensee’s activities shall be supervised by another physician and surgeon.

(2) Total or partial restrictions on drug prescribing
 privileges for controlled substances.

(3) Continuing medical or psychiatric treatment.

(4) Ongoing participation in a specified rehabilitation program.

(5) Enrollment and successful completion of a clinical training program.

(6) Abstention from the use of alcohol or drugs.

(7) Restrictions against engaging in certain types of medical practice.

(8) Compliance with all provisions of this chapter.

(9) Payment of the cost of probation monitoring.

(b) The board may modify or terminate the terms and conditions imposed on the probationary certificate upon receipt of a petition from the licensee. The board may assign the petition to an administrative law judge designated in Section 11371 of the Government Code. After a hearing on the petition, the administrative law judge shall provide a proposed decision to the board.

(c) The board shall deny a physician’s and surgeon’s certificate to an applicant who is required to register pursuant to Section 290 of the Penal Code. This subdivision does not apply to an applicant who is required to register as a sex offender pursuant to Section 290 of the Penal Code solely because of a misdemeanor conviction under Section 314 of the Penal Code.

(d) An applicant shall not be eligible to reapply for a physician’s and surgeon’s certificate for a minimum of three years from the effective date of the denial of their application, except that the board, in its discretion and for good cause demonstrated, may permit reapplication after not less than one year has elapsed from the effective date of the denial.

(e) The board shall disclose a probationary physician’s and surgeon’s certificate issued pursuant to this section and the operative statement of issues to an inquiring member of the public and shall post the certificate and statement on the board’s internet website for 10 years from issuance.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 849, Sec. 3.   (SB 425)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

2221.05.

(a) Notwithstanding subdivision (a) of Section 2221, the board may issue a physician’s and surgeon’s certificate to an applicant who has committed minor violations that the board deems, in its discretion, do not merit the denial of a certificate or require probationary status under Section 2221, and may concurrently issue a public letter of reprimand.

(b) A public letter of reprimand issued concurrently with a physician’s and surgeon’s certificate shall be purged three years from
 the date of issuance.

(c) A public letter of reprimand issued pursuant to this section shall be disclosed to an inquiring member of the public and shall be posted on the board’s Internet Web site.

(d) Nothing in this section shall be construed to affect the board’s authority to issue an unrestricted license.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 247, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

2221.1.

(a) The board and the California Board of Podiatric Medicine shall investigate and may take disciplinary action, including, but not limited to, revocation or suspension of licenses, against physicians and surgeons and all others licensed or regulated by the board, or by the California Board of Podiatric Medicine, whichever is applicable, who, except for good cause, knowingly fail to protect patients by failing to follow
 infection control guidelines of the applicable board, thereby risking transmission of blood-borne infectious diseases from the physician and surgeon or other health care provider licensed or regulated by the applicable board to patients, from patients, and from patient to physician and surgeon or other health care provider regulated by the applicable board. In so doing, the boards shall consider referencing the standards, regulations, and guidelines of the State Department of Public Health developed pursuant to Section 1250.11 of the Health and Safety Code and the standards, guidelines, and regulations pursuant to the California Occupational Safety and Health Act of 1973 (Part 1 (commencing with Section 6300) of Division 5 of the Labor Code) for preventing the transmission of HIV, hepatitis B, and other blood-borne pathogens in health care settings. As necessary, the board and the California Board of Podiatric Medicine shall consult with the Dental Board of California, the Board of Registered Nursing, and
 the Board of Vocational Nursing and Psychiatric Technicians of the State of California to encourage appropriate consistency in the implementation of this section.

(b) Subdivision (a) does not apply to an organ transplant performed within the standard of care and in compliance with subdivision (d) of Section 1644.5 of the Health and Safety Code.

(c) The board shall seek to ensure that licentiates and others regulated by the board are informed of the responsibility of licentiates to follow infection control guidelines and of the most recent scientifically recognized safeguards for minimizing the transmission of blood-borne infectious diseases.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 561, Sec. 2.   (AB 1516)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

2222.

The California Board of Podiatric Medicine shall enforce and administer this article as to doctors of podiatric medicine. Any acts of unprofessional conduct or other violations proscribed by this chapter are applicable to licensed doctors of podiatric medicine and wherever the Medical Quality Hearing Panel established under Section 11371 of the Government Code is vested with the authority to enforce and carry out this chapter as to licensed physicians and surgeons, the Medical Quality Hearing Panel also possesses that same authority as to licensed doctors of
 podiatric medicine.

The California Board of Podiatric Medicine may order the denial of an application or issue a certificate subject to conditions as set forth in Section 2221, or order the revocation, suspension, or other restriction of, or the modification of that penalty, and the reinstatement of any certificate of a doctor of podiatric medicine within its authority as granted by this chapter and in conjunction with the administrative hearing procedures established pursuant to Sections 11371, 11372, 11373, and 11529 of the Government Code. For these purposes, the California Board of Podiatric Medicine shall exercise the powers granted and be governed by the procedures set forth in this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1267, Sec. 19.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

2224.

(a) The board may delegate the authority under this chapter to conduct investigations and inspections and to institute proceedings to the executive director of the board or to other personnel as set forth in Section 2020. The board shall not delegate its authority to take final disciplinary action against a licensee as provided in Section 2227 and other provisions of this chapter. The board shall not delegate any authority of the Senior Assistant Attorney General of the Health Quality Enforcement Section or any powers vested in the administrative law judges of the Office of Administrative Hearings, as designated in Section 11371 of the Government Code.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), the board shall delegate to its
 executive director the authority to adopt a decision entered by default, a stipulation for surrender of a license, and automatic revocations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 294, Sec. 13.   (SB 815)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

2225.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 2263 and any other law making a communication between a physician and surgeon or a doctor of podiatric medicine and his or her patients a privileged communication, those provisions shall not apply to investigations or proceedings conducted under this chapter. Members of the board, the Senior Assistant Attorney General of the Health Quality Enforcement Section, members of the
 California Board of Podiatric Medicine, and deputies, employees, agents, and representatives of the board or the California Board of Podiatric Medicine and the Senior Assistant Attorney General of the Health Quality Enforcement Section shall keep in confidence during the course of investigations, the names of any patients whose records are reviewed and shall not disclose or reveal those names, except as is necessary during the course of an investigation, unless and until proceedings are instituted. The authority of the board or the California Board of Podiatric Medicine and the Health Quality Enforcement Section to examine records of patients in the office of a physician and surgeon or a doctor of podiatric medicine is limited to records of patients who have complained to the board or the California Board of Podiatric Medicine about that licensee.

(b) Notwithstanding any other law, the Attorney General and his or her investigative agents, and
 investigators and representatives of the board or the California Board of Podiatric Medicine, may inquire into any alleged violation of the Medical Practice Act or any other federal or state law, regulation, or rule relevant to the practice of medicine or podiatric medicine, whichever is applicable, and may inspect documents relevant to those investigations in accordance with the following procedures:

(1) Any document relevant to an investigation may be inspected, and copies may be obtained, where patient consent is given.

(2) Any document relevant to the business operations of a licensee, and not involving medical records attributable to identifiable patients, may be inspected and copied if relevant to an investigation of a licensee.

(c) (1) Notwithstanding subdivision (b) or any other law, in
 any investigation that involves the death of a patient, the board may inspect and copy the medical records of the deceased patient without the authorization of the beneficiary or personal representative of the deceased patient or a court order solely for the purpose of determining the extent to which the death was the result of the physician and surgeon’s conduct in violation of the Medical Practice Act, if the board provides a written request to either the physician and surgeon or the facility where the medical records are located or the care to the deceased patient was provided, that includes a declaration that the board has been unsuccessful in locating or contacting the deceased patient’s beneficiary or personal representative after reasonable efforts. Nothing in this subdivision shall be construed to allow the board to inspect and copy the medical records of a deceased patient without a court order when the beneficiary or personal representative of the deceased patient has been located and contacted but
 has refused to consent to the board inspecting and copying the medical records of the deceased patient.

(2) The Legislature finds and declares that the authority created in the board pursuant to this section, and a physician and surgeon’s compliance with this section, are consistent with the public interest and benefit activities of the federal Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act (HIPAA).

(d) In all cases in which documents are inspected or copies of those documents are received, their acquisition or review shall be arranged so as not to unnecessarily disrupt the medical and business operations of the licensee or of the facility where the records are kept or used.

(e) If documents are lawfully requested from licensees in accordance with this section by the Attorney General or his or her agents or
 deputies, or investigators of the board or the California Board of Podiatric Medicine, the documents shall be provided within 15 business days of receipt of the request, unless the licensee is unable to provide the documents within this time period for good cause, including, but not limited to, physical inability to access the records in the time allowed due to illness or travel. Failure to produce requested documents or copies thereof, after being informed of the required deadline, shall constitute unprofessional conduct. The board may use its authority to cite and fine a physician and surgeon for any violation of this section. This remedy is in addition to any other authority of the board to sanction a licensee for a delay in producing requested records.

(f) Searches conducted of the office or medical facility of any licensee shall not interfere with the recordkeeping format or preservation needs of any licensee necessary for the lawful care
 of patients.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 303, Sec. 3.   (AB 2745)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

2225.3.

The board, the California Board of Podiatric Medicine, and the Attorney General, shall return any original documents received pursuant to Section 2225 to the licensee from whom they were obtained within seven calendar days.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1267, Sec. 21.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

2225.5.

(a) (1) A licensee who fails or refuses to comply with a request for the certified medical records of a patient, that is accompanied by that patient’s written authorization for release of records to the board, within 15 days of receiving the request and authorization, shall pay to the board a civil penalty of one thousand dollars ($1,000) per day for each day that the documents have not been produced after the 15th day, up to ten thousand dollars ($10,000), unless the licensee is unable to provide the documents within this time period for good cause.

(2) A health care facility shall comply with a request for the certified medical records of a patient that is accompanied by that patient’s written authorization for release of records to the
 board together with a notice citing this section and describing the penalties for failure to comply with this section. Failure to provide the authorizing patient’s certified medical records to the board within 30 days of receiving the request, authorization, and notice shall subject the health care facility to a civil penalty, payable to the board, of up to one thousand dollars ($1,000) per day for each day that the documents have not been produced after the 30th day, up to ten thousand dollars ($10,000), unless the health care facility is unable to provide the documents within this time period for good cause. For health care facilities that have electronic health records, failure to provide the authorizing patient’s certified medical records to the board within 15 days of receiving the request, authorization, and notice shall subject the health care facility to a civil penalty, payable to the board, of up to one thousand dollars ($1,000) per day for each day that the documents have not been produced after
 the 15th day, up to ten thousand dollars ($10,000), unless the health care facility is unable to provide the documents within this time period for good cause. This paragraph shall not require health care facilities to assist the board in obtaining the patient’s authorization. The board shall pay the reasonable costs of copying the certified medical records.

(b) (1) A licensee who fails or refuses to comply with a court order, issued in the enforcement of a subpoena, mandating the release of records to the board shall pay to the board a civil penalty of one thousand dollars ($1,000) per day for each day that the documents have not been produced after the date by which the court order requires the documents to be produced, up to ten thousand dollars ($10,000), unless it is determined that the order is unlawful or invalid. Any statute of limitations applicable to the filing of an accusation by the board shall be tolled upon
 the service of an order to show cause pursuant to Section 11188 of the Government Code, until such time as the subpoenaed records are produced, including during any period the licensee is out of compliance with the court order and during any related appeals, or until the court declines to issue an order mandating release of records to the board.

(2) Any licensee who fails or refuses to comply with a court order, issued in the enforcement of a subpoena, mandating the release of records to the board is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by a fine payable to the board not to exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000). The fine shall be added to the licensee’s renewal fee if it is not paid by the next succeeding renewal date. Any statute of limitations applicable to the filing of an accusation by the board shall be tolled during the period the licensee is out of compliance with the court order and during any related appeals.
